North Dakota statutes. TITLE 23 Health and Safety
CHAPTER 23-38.1 Cardiac Ready Community Grant Program

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 198, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

23-38.1-01.
Cardiac ready community grant program. [Effective through August 31, 2022]

The state department of health shall establish a cardiac ready community grant program. The primary purpose of the program is to support bystander, emergency responder, and community private public partnerships for strengthening community-based capacity for cardiac and stroke emergency response and risk reduction programs throughout the state. The program must build on and may not duplicate existing programs. The department shall award grants on a competitive basis based on criteria established by an advisory committee. To facilitate volume purchasing savings, the department may procure vendor rates and purchases, and grant the acquired elements to community programs.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 198, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

23-38.1-01.
Cardiac ready community grant program. [Effective September 1, 2022]

The department of health and human services shall establish a cardiac ready community grant program. The primary purpose of the program is to support bystander, emergency responder, and community private public partnerships for strengthening community-based capacity for cardiac and stroke emergency response and risk reduction programs throughout the state. The program must build on and may not duplicate existing programs. The department shall award grants on a competitive basis based on criteria established by an advisory committee. To facilitate volume purchasing savings, the department may procure vendor rates and purchases, and grant the acquired elements to community programs.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 198, § 1, effective July 1, 2017; 2021, ch. 352, § 244, effective September 1, 2022.

23-38.1-02.
Cardiac ready community grant program advisory committee — Duties.
[Effective through August 31, 2022]

The state department of health shall establish a cardiac ready community grant program advisory committee with members appointed by the state health officer. The advisory committee shall advise the department in the development of the cardiac ready community grant program and the membership must include a representative of the department, one cardiac ready community member, one representative of the emergency medical services association, one representative of the American heart association, one representative of the cardiac task force, one representative of the stroke task force, one representative of the emergency services advisory committee, one survivor advocate, and the state department of health emergency medical services and trauma medical director.

Members of the committee who are not state employees are entitled to mileage and expenses as provided by law for state officers and employees. A state employee who is a member of the committee must receive that employee’s regular salary and is entitled to mileage and expenses, to be paid by the employing agency.

The state department of health, with the advisory committee’s involvement, shall provide assistance to:

Evaluate programs;

Promote public awareness of core program elements;

Facilitate the coordination of program components with the local level;

Involve state agencies, law enforcement, and local government in the administration and management of the program; and

Assist the department in screening and implementing the grants.

The department may study the implementation of the program and shall recommend legislation the cardiac ready community grant program advisory committee considers appropriate to improve the program.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 198, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

Note.

Section 23-38.1-02 was amended 2 times by the 2021 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to

Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 245 of Chapter 352, Session Laws 2021, House Bill 1247; and Section 246 of

Chapter 352, Session Laws 2021, House Bill 1247.

23-38.1-02.
Cardiac ready community grant program advisory committee — Duties.
[Effective September 1, 2022]

The department of health and human services shall establish a cardiac ready community grant program advisory committee with members appointed by the executive director of the department of health and human services or designee. The advisory committee shall advise the department of health and human services in the development of the cardiac ready community grant program and the membership must include a representative of the department of health and human services, one cardiac ready community member, one representative of the emergency medical services association, one representative of the American heart association, one representative of the cardiac task force, one representative of the stroke task force, one representative of the emergency services advisory committee, one survivor advocate, and the department of health and human services emergency medical services and trauma medical director.

Members of the committee who are not state employees are entitled to mileage and expenses as provided by law for state officers and employees. A state employee who is a member of the committee must receive that employee’s regular salary and is entitled to mileage and expenses, to be paid by the employing agency.

The department of health and human services, with the advisory committee’s involvement, shall provide assistance to:

Evaluate programs;

Promote public awareness of core program elements;

Facilitate the coordination of program components with the local level;

Involve state agencies, law enforcement, and local government in the administration and management of the program; and

Assist the department in screening and implementing the grants.

The department may study the implementation of the program and shall recommend legislation the cardiac ready community grant program advisory committee considers appropriate to improve the program.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 198, § 1, effective July 1, 2017; 2021, ch. 352, §§ 245, 246, effective September 1, 2022.

23-38.1-03.
Gifts, grants, and donations — Continuing appropriation. [Effective through August 31, 2022]

The state department of health may accept any gifts, grants, or donations, whether conditional or unconditional. The department or local grantees may contract public or private entities and may expend any available moneys to obtain matching funds for the purposes of this chapter. All moneys received by the state department of health as gifts, grants, or donations under this section are appropriated on a continuing basis to the department’s operations fund for the purpose of funding the grant program.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 198, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

23-38.1-03.
Gifts, grants, and donations — Continuing appropriation. [Effective September 1, 2022]

The department of health and human services may accept any gifts, grants, or donations, whether conditional or unconditional. The department or local grantees may contract public or private entities and may expend any available moneys to obtain matching funds for the purposes of this chapter. All moneys received by the department of health and human services as gifts, grants, or donations under this section are appropriated on a continuing basis to the department’s operations fund for the purpose of funding the grant program.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 198, § 1, effective July 1, 2017; 2021, ch. 352, § 247, effective September 1, 2022.